vi: Tiêu chuẩn điều chỉnh đàn vibraphone: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Khác
pl: Standard stroju wibrafonu: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Inne
es: Estándar de afinación del vibráfono: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Otro
th: มาตรฐานการปรับเสียงไวบราโฟน: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; อื่นๆ
ru: Стандарт настройки вибрафона: A=440 Гц; A=442 Гц; A=443 Гц; Другое
hu: Vibrafon-hangolási szabvány: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Egyéb
sv: Vibrafonstämningsstandard: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Övrigt
el: Πρότυπο κουρδίσματος βιμπραφώνου: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Άλλο
de: Stimmstandard des Vibraphons: A = 440 Hz; A = 442 Hz; A = 443 Hz; Sonstiges
nl: Vibrafoon stemmingsstandaard: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Overige
nb: Standard for stemming av vibrafon: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Annet
fr: Diapason de référence du vibraphone: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Autre
zh-TW: 電鐵琴調音標準: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; 其他
sk-SK: Štandard ladenia vibrafónu: A = 440 Hz; A = 442 Hz; A = 443 Hz; Iné
bg-BG: Стандарт за настройка на вибрафона: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Друго
pt-BR: Vibrafone padrão de afinação: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Outro
sl-SI: Standard uglaševanja vibrafona: A = 440 Hz; A = 442 Hz; A = 443 Hz; Drugo
fi: Vibrafonin viritysstandardi: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Muu
da: Stemningsstandard for vibrafon: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Andet
hr-HR: Standard ugađanja vibrafona: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Ostalo
en: Vibraphone tuning standard: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Other
tr: Vibrafon akort standardı: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Diğer
zh-CN: 颤音琴调音标准: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; 其他
cs: Standard ladění vibrafonu: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Jiné
it: Standard di accordatura del vibrafono: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Altro
lt-LT: Vibrafono derinimo standartas: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Kita
ja: ビブラフォン調律基準: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; その他
pt-PT: Padrão de afinação do vibrafone: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Outro
ro-RO: Standardul de acordaj al vibrafonului: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; Altele
ko: 비브라폰 조율 기준: A=440 Hz; A=442 Hz; A=443 Hz; 기타